District of Columbia statutes.
29-408.21

Bylaw increasing quorum or voting requirement for board of directors or designated body.

(a)

A bylaw that increases a quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors or a designated body may be amended or repealed:

(1)

If originally adopted by the members, only by the members, unless the bylaws otherwise provide;

(2)

If adopted by the board of directors or designated body, either by the members or by the board of directors or designated body.

(b)

A bylaw adopted or amended by the members that increases a quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors or a designated body may provide that it can be amended or repealed only by a specified vote of either the members or the board of directors or designated body.

(c)

Action by the board of directors or a designated body under subsection (a) of this section to amend or repeal a bylaw that changes the quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors or a designated body shall meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote required to take action under the quorum and voting requirement then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-408.20.